California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) There is hereby appropriated ten million dollars ($10,000,000) from the Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Water Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2006 (Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001)) to be expended as follows:

(1) The amount appropriated in this item is available for expenditures for capital outlay and support for capital outlay projects of a state park.

(2) No commitment of funds from this item shall be authorized prior to 30 days after the Department of Parks and Recreation notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance of the projects to be funded from
 this section. No funds shall be expended for capital outlay projects without prior approval of the State Public Works Board.

(3) The amount appropriated in this section shall be available for expenditure until June 30, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 530, Sec. 5.   (AB 1478)   Effective September 25, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

542.

The department may encourage and render assistance in the promotion of training programs for volunteer and professional recreation leaders in cooperation with other agencies, organizations and institutions, and may encourage the establishment of standards for recreation personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1179.)
-------------------------------------------

543.

The department may assist every department, commission, board, agency and officer of the state in rendering recreational services in conformity with their respective authorized powers and duties and encourage and assist in the coordination of federal, state and local recreational activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1179.)
-------------------------------------------

546.

The director may authorize any employee of the department to exercise any power granted to, or to perform any duty imposed upon, the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1179.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. City of Pismo Beach Seawall Repair [560. - 563.]

560.

The department may participate or contract with the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the County of San Luis Obispo, or the City of Pismo Beach, or any or all of them, in repairing and improving the concrete seawall at Pismo State Beach adjacent to the Pacific Ocean in the City of Pismo Beach, including access ways, safety railing, utilities, repaving, and restroom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1199, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

561.

The department shall permit the United States, if it agrees to accomplish all or part of the work, to use the necessary real property, or any interest therein, for the work to be performed pursuant to this article. The department may hold and save the federal government free from damages for all time due to the construction, operation, and maintenance of the seawall, including access ways, safety railing, utilities, repaving, and restroom, and may provide directly or by agreement with the City of Pismo Beach items of local cooperation as may be required for federal participation in this project. Items of local cooperation provided by the department shall be subject to the approval of the Director of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1199, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

562.

The department, with the approval of the Director of Finance and on terms satisfactory to the department, may advance moneys appropriated for purposes of this article to the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the County of San Luis Obispo, or the City of Pismo Beach, or any or all of them, for the repair, replacement, or improvement of the facilities described in Section 561.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1199, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

563.

Notwithstanding Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 65) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code and Part 6 (commencing with Section 12570) of Division 6 of the Water Code, the department shall perform the duties imposed on it pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1199, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Department of Conservation [600. - 690.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization and General Powers [600. - 617.]

600.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of Conservation and “director” means the Director of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

There is in the Resources Agency the Department of Conservation. The department shall be conducted under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Conservation. The director shall be appointed by and hold office at the pleasure of the Governor and shall receive an annual salary as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The appointment of the director shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

The department succeeds to and is vested with all of the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction vested in the Department of Natural Resources or the Director of Natural Resources and exercised by the following divisions of the Department of Natural Resources: Forestry; Mines and Geology; Oil and Gas; and Soil Conservation.

Wherever any reference is made to the Department of Natural Resources or to the Director of Natural Resources pertaining to a duty, power, purpose, responsibility, or jurisdiction transferred to the Department of Conservation by this section, it shall be deemed to be a reference to, and to mean, the Department of Conservation or to the Director of Conservation, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

603.1.

The director is hereby vested with all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the State Geologist as Chief of the California Geological Survey of the department. The director may appoint an assistant or deputy director to exercise any powers and duties in the administration of the California Geological Survey that the director may delegate to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

The department may expend the money in any appropriation or in any special fund in the State Treasury made available by law for the administration of the statutes the administration of which is committed to the department, or for the use, support, or maintenance of any board, bureau, commission, department, office or officer whose duties, powers, and functions have been transferred to and conferred upon the department. Such expenditures by the department shall be made in accordance with law in carrying out the purposes for which the appropriations were made or the special funds created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

The department shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of all bodies, offices, and officers whose duties, powers, and functions have been transferred to and conferred upon the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code apply to the director. The director may appoint, in accordance with civil service, such deputies, officers, and other employees as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

The work of the department shall be divided into at least the following:

(a) California Geological Survey.

(b) (1) Geologic Energy Management Division.

(2) Any reference in any law or regulation to the Division of Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Resources in the Department of Conservation is deemed to,
 instead, refer to the Geologic Energy Management Division.

(c) Division of Land Resource Protection.

(d) Division of Mine Reclamation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 6.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

The director, with approval of the Director of Finance, may accept on behalf of the various divisions of the department federal grants for the purposes for which the department is established. Such grants shall be deposited in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury provided for by Section 16370 of the Government Code, and may be expended under such terms and conditions as may be required by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

609.

Whenever the department has received and deposited any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund in an excessive amount or in error, or whenever a refund of all or a portion of such money is due any person, firm, or corporation because of the termination of an agreement or other lawful reason, payment of such refund shall be made upon the filing of a claim by the director with the State Controller. The State Controller shall draw his warrant for payment of the refund from any appropriation made for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

610.

For the purpose of disseminating information relating to its activities, powers, duties, or functions, the department may issue publications, construct and maintain exhibits, and perform acts and carry on functions, as in the opinion of the director, will best tend to disseminate the information.

These publications may be distributed free of charge to public libraries and to other state departments and state officers. The department may exchange copies with contemporary publications.

All money received by the department from the sale of publications, exclusive of money received by any separate division of the department from the sale of publications, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, on and after January 1, 1980, the department, director, the State Geologist, the State Mining and Geology Board, or the California Geological Survey shall not adopt nor publish a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

The department shall prepare, update, and maintain Important Farmland Series maps as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 65560 of the Government Code and other soils and land capability information, and prepare and maintain an automated map and data base system to record and report changes in the use of agricultural lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 434, Sec. 9.   (SB 732)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

612.5.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is in the state’s public interest to have an accurate inventory of the state’s soil resources.

(2) In California, the United States Soil Conservation Service has been responsible for undertaking soil surveys and soils information for many of California’s agricultural counties is outdated or unavailable.

(3) Information on soils is needed for agricultural management, water and soil conservation activities, engineering and land use planning, and state and local policy decisions. Completion of the California Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program is contingent upon availability of accurate, modern soil surveys.

(4) State funding of soil surveys has been limited to soil vegetation surveys on wildlands and no state contributions have been made toward the completion of modern soil surveys in California on cropland. In recent years, every state with incomplete soil surveys on farmland, except California, has cost-shared with the United States Soil Conservation Service to complete those surveys.

(5) Federal funding for the soil survey program of the United States Soil Conservation Service has been declining in real dollars in the past several years and is projected to be further reduced under the requirements of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings Deficit Reduction Act.

(6) Therefore, it is in California’s interest to authorize the department to assist the United States Soil Conservation Service with the completion of soil surveys.

(b) The department shall provide financial assistance to the United States Soil Conservation Service to undertake or complete soil surveys in areas of this state where the surveys have not been completed, including, but not limited to, portions of the Counties of San Joaquin, Yuba, Colusa, Butte, Fresno, Kern, Tulare, Stanislaus, and Lassen. Financial assistance shall be applied to field work that includes onsite soils mapping, report writing, manuscript preparation, and final correlation of soils data.

(c) In allocating funds for completion of soil surveys in the United States Soil Conservation Service soil survey areas in California, the department shall consider criteria that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Voids in important farmland maps.

(2) Rate and type of land use changes.

(3) Extent of erosion, alkalinity, and other soil resource problems.

(4) Farm-gate value of agricultural production.

(5) Specific soil-related problems.

(6) Status of ongoing soil surveys.

(7) Extent of cropland in each county.

(8) Availability of local funding or other support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

613.

The department, through the California Resources Information System and as budgetary resources permit, may provide informational assistance to local agencies in the development of geobased natural resource information systems. In addition, the department may assist local agencies in securing geobased natural resource information from state agencies.

Local agencies requesting assistance shall reimburse the department for identifiable costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

614.

The department may do any of the following: 

(a) Advise a city, county, city and county, special district, including a resource conservation district, state agency, federal agency, tribal agency, and the general public on issues of conservation importance, including, but not limited to, planning activities and documents.

(b) Review and provide comments to documents prepared in accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(c) Administer local assistance programs, including grants and contracts.

(d) Serve as a state-level
 liaison with resource conservation districts.

(e) Provide assistance to resource conservation districts, including, but not limited to, equipment, technology, training, education, technical assistance, financial assistance, assistance to support or improve the district’s organization or capacity, and any other goods or services.

(f) Cooperate with and promote coordination of the activities of any federal, state, local, or tribal agency, including cities, counties, special districts, including resource conservation districts, and California Native American tribes on issues of conservation importance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 2.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

615.

Grants administered by the department, including, but not limited to, those awarded pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9001), Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200), and Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500), are not subject to the State Contract Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 5.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

Upon an appropriation by the Legislature, or as other funds become available and are appropriated for these purposes, the department may provide grants and other forms of local assistance to resource conservation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 585, Sec. 3.   (AB 1902)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Mining and Geology Board [660. - 678.]

660.

There is in the department a State Mining and Geology Board consisting of nine members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

As used in this article, “board” means the State Mining and Geology Board and “division” means the California Geological Survey of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 869, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

(a) One member of the board shall be a professional geologist with background and experience in mining geology; one member shall be a mining engineer with background and experience in mining minerals in California; one member shall have background and experience in groundwater hydrology, water quality, and rock chemistry; one member shall be a representative of local government with background and experience in urban planning; one member shall have background and experience in the field of environmental protection or the study of ecosystems; one member shall be a professional geologist, registered geophysicist, registered civil engineer, or registered structural engineer with background and experience in seismology; one member shall be a landscape architect with background and experience in soil conservation or revegetation of disturbed soils; one member shall have background and experience in mineral resource conservation, development, and utilization; and one member shall not be required to have specialized experience.

(b) All members of the board shall represent the general public interest, but not more than one-third of the members at any one time may be currently employed by, or receive more than 25 percent of their annual income, not to exceed $25,000 a year per member, from an entity that owns or operates a mine in California. The representative of local government shall not be considered an employee of an entity that owns or operates a mine if the lead agency employing the representative owns or operates a mine. For purposes of this section, retirement or other benefits paid by a mining entity to an individual who is no longer employed by that entity are not considered to be compensation, if those benefits were earned prior to the date the individual terminated his or her employment with the entity.

(c) If a member of the board determines that he or she has a conflict of interest on a particular matter before the board pursuant to subdivision (b) or Section 663, he or she shall provide the clerk of the board with a brief written explanation of the basis for the conflict of interest, which shall become a part of the public record of the board. The written explanation shall be delivered prior to the time the matter to which it pertains is voted on by the board. This disclosure requirement is in addition to any other conflict-of-interest disclosure requirement imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 865, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

(a) No member of the board shall participate in any action of the board or attempt to influence any decision of the board that involves himself or herself, or any person with whom he or she is connected, as a director, officer, paid consultant, or full-time or part-time employee, or in which he or she has a financial interest within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(b) No board member shall participate in any proceeding before any state or local agency as a consultant or in any other capacity on behalf of any person who engages in surface mining operations.

(c) Upon request of any person, or on his or her own initiative, the Attorney General may file a complaint in the superior court for the county in which the board has its principal office alleging that a board member has knowingly violated this section, alleging the facts upon which the allegation is based, and asking that the member be removed from office. Further proceedings shall be in accordance as nearly as practicable with rules governing civil actions. If after trial the court finds that the board member has knowingly violated this section it shall order the member removed from office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 278, Sec. 2.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

663.1.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “ex parte communication” means any oral or written communication between a member of the board and an interested person about a matter within the board’s jurisdiction that does not occur in a public hearing, workshop, or other official proceeding, or on the official record of the proceeding on the matter.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a matter within the board’s jurisdiction” means any action on a reclamation plan or financial assurance appealed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2770, any review of an order setting administrative penalties pursuant to Section 2774.2, or any review of an appeal pursuant to Section 2775.

(c) A board member or any person, other than a staff member of the board, department, or any other state agency, who is acting in his or her official capacity and who intends to influence the decision of the board on a matter within the board’s jurisdiction, shall not conduct an ex parte communication, unless the board member or the person who engages in the communication with the board member discloses that communication in one of the following ways:

(1) The board member or the person fully discloses the communication and makes public the ex parte communication by providing a full report of the communication to the executive officer or, if the communication occurs within seven days of the next board hearing, to the board on the record of the proceeding of that hearing.

(2) When two or more board members receive substantially the same written communication or receive the same oral communication from the same party on the same matter, one of the board members fully discloses the communication on behalf of the other board member or members who received the communication and requests in writing that it be placed in the board’s official record of the proceeding.

(d) (1) The board shall adopt standard disclosure forms for reporting ex parte communications which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) The date, time, and location of the communication.

(B) The identity of the person or persons initiating and the person or persons receiving the communication.

(C) A complete description of the content of the communication, including the complete text of any written material that was part of the communication.

(2) The executive officer shall place in the public record any report of an ex parte communication.

(e) Communications shall cease to be ex parte communications when fully disclosed and placed in the board’s official record.

(f) In addition to any other applicable penalty, a board member who knowingly violates this section is subject to a civil fine, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the court may award attorneys’ fees and costs to the prevailing party.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, the ex parte communications provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 11430.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) do not apply to proceedings of the board under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

663.2.

(a) No board member shall make, participate in making, or in any other way attempt to use his or her official position to influence a board decision about which the member has knowingly had an ex parte communication that has not been reported pursuant to Section 663.1.

(b) In addition to any other applicable penalty, including a civil fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 663.1, a board member who knowingly violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the court may award attorneys’ fees and costs to the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 278, Sec. 4.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

Each member of the board shall hold office for four years. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

667.

Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which the member is engaged in the performance of official duties. The compensation of each member, except the compensation of the chair, shall not, however, exceed in any one fiscal year the sum of four thousand dollars ($4,000). The chair of the board may receive compensation not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one fiscal year for the performance of official duties. In addition to the compensation, each member shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 254.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

668.

The board shall maintain its headquarters in Sacramento and shall hold meetings at such times and at such places as shall be determined by it. Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting any business of the board. A majority affirmative vote of the total authorized membership of the board shall be necessary to adopt, amend, or repeal state policy for the reclamation of mined lands adopted pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2755) of Chapter 9 of Division 2. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

669.

The Governor shall designate the chair of the board from among the members of the board. The person designated as the chair shall hold the office at the pleasure of the Governor. The board shall annually elect a vice chair from among its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 4.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

670.

The board may appoint an executive officer who shall be exempt from civil service. The board may also employ the clerical assistance necessary for the proper discharge of its duties. Neither the board nor its employees shall have or be given
 any powers in relation to the administration of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

The director shall have no power to amend or repeal any order, ruling, or directive of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

The board shall represent the state’s interest in the development, utilization, and conservation of the mineral resources of the state and the reclamation of mined lands, as provided by law, and federal matters pertaining to mining, and shall determine, establish, and maintain an adequate surface mining and reclamation policy. The board shall also represent the state’s interest in the development of geological information necessary to the understanding and utilization of the state’s terrain, and seismological and geological information pertaining to earthquake and other geological hazards. General policies for the division shall be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

The board shall also serve as a policy and appeals board for the purposes of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

The board may provide for a statewide program of research regarding the technical phases of reclaiming mined lands which may be delegated to it by law and may accept funds from the United States or from any person to aid in carrying out the provisions of this section. The board may conduct such a program independently or by contract or in cooperation with any person, public or private organization, federal agency, or state agency, including any political subdivision of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

The board shall provide for a public information program on matters involving the state’s terrain, mineral resources, mining, the reclamation of mined lands, and the seismological and geological aspects of earthquakes and other geological hazards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

The board shall nominate, and the director shall appoint, the State Geologist, who shall either be registered in compliance with the Geologist and Geophysicist Act (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) at least one year from the date of appointment, or the Board for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors may, upon the review of academic and professional experience, grant registration. The State Geologist shall possess
 general knowledge of mineral resources, structural geology, seismology, engineering geology, and related disciplines in science and engineering, and the reclamation of mined lands and waters. The State Geologist shall advise the director regarding technical, scientific, and engineering issues, including the scientific quality of the division's products and activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 18, Sec. 68.   (AB 20 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

The director may authorize the State Geologist to exercise his power to appoint employees of the division in accordance with the State Civil Service Act. The director may authorize the State Geologist, or any employee of the division, to exercise any power granted to, or perform any duty imposed upon, the director by the State Civil Service Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Geologic Energy Management Division [690. - 690.]

690.

The Geologic Energy Management Division shall be in charge of a chief, known as the State Oil and Gas Supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 7.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Department of Forestry and Fire Protection [700. - 783.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization and General Powers [700. - 717.]

700.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(c) “Director” means the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

(a) There is in the Resources Agency the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, which is under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection. The director is appointed by the Governor and holds office at the pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the director is subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next regular or special session of the Legislature, and the refusal or failure of the Senate to confirm the appointment shall create a vacancy in the office. The director shall receive an annual salary as provided by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) There shall be one Deputy Director of Forestry and Fire Protection appointed by the director who shall be exempt from civil service.

(c) There shall be one Deputy Director of Forestry and Fire Protection appointed by the director in accordance with the State Civil Service Act who shall be a registered professional forester.

(d) The deputy directors shall have duties as assigned, from time to time, by the director, and they shall be responsible to the director for the performance of those duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

701.5.

Notwithstanding Section 701, Section 12805 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, on and after January 1, 1987, the Department of Forestry shall be the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

On and after that date, any reference to the Department of Forestry is deemed to be to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and any reference to the Director of Forestry is deemed to be to the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection.

No existing supplies, forms, insignias, signs, or logos shall be destroyed or changed as a result of this name change, and they shall continue to be used until exhausted or unserviceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

701.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after January 1, 2007, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may be referred to, where appropriate and as determined by the director, as CAL-FIRE.

(b) No existing supplies, forms, insignias, signs, or logos shall be destroyed or changed as a result of the authorization to use CAL-FIRE where appropriate to refer to the department, and they shall continue to be used until exhausted or unserviceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

(a) Pursuant to Section 13100 of the Health and Safety Code, there is within the department the Office of the State Fire Marshal.

(b) There shall be a Chief Deputy Director of Forestry and Fire Protection who shall administer the Office of the State Fire Marshal and who shall be known as the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal shall be appointed pursuant to Section 13101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The State Fire Marshal may, with the approval of the director, appoint assistant or deputy state fire marshals and employ office and field assistants and other employees pursuant to Sections 12551, 13102, and 13103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) There is within the Office of the State Fire Marshal the State Board of Fire Services, established pursuant to Section 13140 of the Health and Safety Code. The State Board of Fire Services shall advise the State Fire Marshal as provided by law.

(e) The Office of the State Fire Marshal, as a component of the department, shall have access to all resources of the department in carrying out its mission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 11.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

The director shall appoint a cultural burning liaison who shall do all of the following:

(a) Advise the department on developing increased cultural burning activity.

(b) Engage with California Native American tribes, tribal organizations, and cultural fire practitioners, as defined in Section 4002.6, on opportunities to partner with the department.

(c) Make recommendations to the director on ways to reduce barriers to cultural burning, as defined in Section 4002.4.

(d) Serve on the State Fire Marshal’s State Board of Fire Services, as established by Article 2 (commencing with
 Section 13140) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Work with unit chiefs across the state to ensure prescribed fire and cultural burning objectives are understood and supported by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 375, Sec. 6.   (AB 642)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

The department may expend the money in any appropriation or in any special fund in the State Treasury made available by law for the administration of the statutes the administration of which is committed to the department, or for the use, support, or maintenance of any board, bureau, commission, department, office, or officer whose duties, powers, and functions have been transferred to, and conferred upon, the department. Such expenditures by the department shall be made in accordance with law in carrying out the purposes for which the appropriations were made or the special funds created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

The department shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of all bodies, offices, and officers whose duties, powers, and functions have been transferred to, and conferred upon, the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

707.
